District of Columbia statutes.
47-365

Reprogrammings of appropriated funds.

(a)

Funds appropriated pursuant to an appropriations act that remain available for obligation or expenditure, or provided from any accounts in the Treasury of the United States derived by the collection of fees available to the agencies funded in an appropriations act, shall be available for obligation or expenditure for an agency through a reprogramming of funds which:

(1)

Creates new programs;

(2)

Eliminates a program, project, or responsibility center;

(3)

Establishes or changes allocations specifically denied, limited, or increased by Congress;

(4)

Increases funds or personnel by any means for any program, project, or responsibility center for which funds have been denied or restricted;

(5)

Reestablishes through reprogramming any program or project previously deferred through reprogramming;

(6)

Augments existing programs, projects, or responsibility centers through a reprogramming of funds in excess of $3 million or 10%, whichever is less; or

(7)

Increases by 20% or more personnel assigned to a specific program, project or responsibility center.

(b)

Such funds shall be available for obligation or expenditure for an agency through a reprogramming of funds as described in subsection (a) of this section; provided, that the appropriations committees of both the Senate and House of Representatives are notified in writing 30 days in advance of any reprogramming as set forth in this section.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 4502, 47 DCR 6308
June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 11(a), 50 DCR 1092
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 122(d), 58 DCR 1008
D.C. Law 14-310, in the section name line, deleted “Fiscal Year 2001 and beyond” following “funds”; redesignated the existing text as subsection (a); in the newly designated subsec. (a), deleted “in fiscal year 2001, or any subsequent fiscal year” following “expenditure”; made a nonsubstantive change, and deleted “provided that the appropriations committees of both the Senate and House of Representatives are notified in writing 30 days in advance of any reprogramming as set forth in this section” from the end of par. (7); and added subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 18-370, in par. (6), substituted “$3 million” for “$1,000,000”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 122(d) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).